test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-leed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - leeʹd: # Verb 'to be' - full paradigm
     leeʹd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: leäm
     leeʹd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: leäk
     leeʹd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lij
     leeʹd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: leäʹp
     leeʹd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [leäʹped, leʹped]
     leeʹd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [lie, liâ, lee] 
     leeʹd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: leät

     leeʹd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: leʹjjem
     leeʹd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: leʹjjiǩ
     leeʹd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [leäi, leei, läi]
     leeʹd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: leeim
     leeʹd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: leeid
     leeʹd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: leʹjje
     leeʹd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: leʹjješ

     leeʹd+V+Pot+Sg1: leʹžžem
     leeʹd+V+Pot+Sg2: leʹžžiǩ
     leeʹd+V+Pot+Sg3: [leežž, leež]
     leeʹd+V+Pot+Pl1: [leʹžžep, leʹžžim]
     leeʹd+V+Pot+Pl2: leʹžžveʹted
     leeʹd+V+Pot+Pl3: leʹžže
     leeʹd+V+Pot+Sg4: leʹžžet
     leeʹd+V+Pot+ConNeg: leʹžže

     leeʹd+V+Cond+Sg1: leʹččem
     leeʹd+V+Cond+Sg2: leʹččiǩ
     leeʹd+V+Cond+Sg3: leʹčči
     leeʹd+V+Cond+Pl1: [leʹččim, leʹččep]
     leeʹd+V+Cond+Pl2: leʹččid
     leeʹd+V+Cond+Pl3: leʹčče
     leeʹd+V+Cond+Sg4: leʹččeš
     leeʹd+V+Cond+ConNeg: leʹčče

     leeʹd+V+Imprt+Sg2: leäk'ku
     leeʹd+V+Imprt+Sg3: leäǥǥas
     leeʹd+V+Imprt+Pl1: leäk'kap
     leeʹd+V+Imprt+Pl2: [leäk'ku, leäk'kveʹted]
     leeʹd+V+Imprt+Pl3: leäk'kaz
     leeʹd+V+Imprt+ConNeg: leäk'ku
     leeʹd+V+Act+PrsPrc: leʹddi
     leeʹd+V+Act+PrfPrc: [leämmaž, leämma, leäm]

#     leeʹd+V+Imprt+ConNeg: iʹlleäkku
#     leeʹd+V+Actio+Ess: åårmen
#     leeʹd+V+Actio: åårram
#     leeʹd+V+Act+PrfPrc: [iʹlleäm, iʹllääm, jeäʹlääm]
#     leeʹd+V+Pass+PrfPrc:
#     leeʹd+V+VAbess: åårǩâni
#     leeʹd+V+Ger+Ess:
#     leeʹd+V+Ger+Instr: 
